District of Columbia statutes.
1-204.111

“Recall” defined.

The term “recall” means the process by which the qualified electors of the District of Columbia may call for the holding of an election to remove or retain an elected official of the District of Columbia (except the Delegate to Congress for the District of Columbia) prior to the expiration of his or her term.

Mar. 10, 1978, D.C. Law 2-46, § 2, 24 DCR 199
Elections, recall of elected officials, see § 1-1001.17.
This section is referenced in § 1-1001.17.
1981 Ed., § 1-291.
1973 Ed., § 1-191.